Nevada, session 83, AB131.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. Chapter 361 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An accessory dwelling unit is exempt from taxation if, for
the year in which the exemption applies, the accessory dwelling
unit:
(a) Is rented or leased to a qualified tenant receiving
assistance under the Housing Choice Voucher Program pursuant
to a written lease which is for a period of not less than 12
consecutive months;
(b) Is located on the same parcel as a single-family residence
which is the primary residence of the owner of the accessory
dwelling unit;
(c) Complies with all applicable local zoning laws; and
(d) If the parcel is located within a common-interest
community, complies with all applicable covenants, conditions and
restrictions of the common-interest community.
2. Any person claiming an exemption pursuant to this section
must file annually with the county assessor:
(a) Verification from the appropriate public housing authority
that:
(1) The person has entered into a housing assistance
payment contract with the public housing authority to receive
tenant-based assistance payments under the Housing Choice
Voucher Program for the accessory dwelling unit;
(2) The qualified tenant to whom the accessory dwelling
unit is rented or leased is receiving assistance under the Housing
Choice Voucher Program pursuant to a written lease which is for
a period of not less than 12 consecutive months; and
(3) The accessory dwelling unit, at the time it was last
inspected, met the housing quality standards set forth in 42 U.S.C.
1437f(o); and
(b) A copy of the lease for the accessory dwelling unit, which
must set forth, without limitation, the total square footage of the
accessory dwelling unit.
3. The person may claim an exemption pursuant to this
section for one accessory dwelling unit per parcel.
-
*AB131_R1*

– 3 –
4. To determine the value of the accessory dwelling unit for
the purposes of an exemption claimed pursuant to this section, the
value is equal to the cost of replacing the accessory dwelling unit,
which must be calculated by the county assessor in accordance
with the regulations adopted by the Nevada Tax Commission
pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 361.227.
5. A county assessor may prescribe forms and adopt
procedures for claiming the exemption pursuant to this section not
inconsistent with any regulations, forms and procedures
prescribed or adopted by the Department or the Nevada Tax
Commission.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” means an ancillary or secondary
living unit that has a separate egress, kitchen, bathroom and
sleeping area existing on the same lot as a single-family residence.
(b) “Housing Choice Voucher Program” means the federal
tenant-based assistance program established under 42 U.S.C.
1437f(o).
(c) “Qualified tenant” means a person who is not employed by
or related to the owner of the property on which the accessory
dwelling unit is located by consanguinity or affinity within the
third degree.
Sec. 7. NRS 361.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.160 1. Personal property in transit through this State is
personal property:
(a) Which is moving in interstate commerce through or over the
territory of the State of Nevada; or
(b) Which was consigned to a warehouse, public or private,
within the State of Nevada from outside the State of Nevada for
storage in transit to a final destination outside the State of Nevada,
whether specified when transportation begins or afterward.
 Such property is deemed to have acquired no situs in Nevada for
purposes of taxation. Such property is not deprived of exemption
because while in the warehouse the property is assembled, bound,
joined, manufactured, processed, disassembled, divided, cut, broken
in bulk, relabeled or repackaged, or because the property is being
held for resale to customers outside the State of Nevada. The
exemption granted shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes
of NRS 361.160 to 361.185, inclusive.
2. Personal property within this State as mentioned in NRS
361.030 and 361.045 to 361.155, inclusive, and section 6 of this act
does not include personal property in transit through this State as
defined in this section.
Sec. 8. The Legislature hereby finds that the exemption
provided by this act from any ad valorem tax on property:
-
*AB131_R1*

– 4 –
1. Will achieve a bona fide social or economic purpose and that
the benefits of the exemption are expected to exceed any adverse
effect of the exemption on the provision of services to the public by
the State or a local government that would otherwise receive
revenue from the tax from which the exemption would be granted;
and
2. Will not impair adversely the ability of the State or a local
government to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
the tax from which the exemption would be granted was pledged.
Sec. 9. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 8, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB131_R1*